Wisconsin, session 2025, SB770.
do enact as follows:SB770,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB770,211Section 2. 20.115 (4) (at) of the statutes is created to read:SB770,2,131220.115 (4) (at) Farm to fork program. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule 13for the farm to fork program under s. 93.63.SB770,314Section 3. 20.255 (1) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:SB770,2,171520.255 (1) (ac) Farm to school program. The amounts in the schedule to 16provide matching funds for grants under 42 USC 1769 (g) (3), the federal farm to 17school program.SB770,41Section 4. 93.49 (3) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 93.49 (3) (a) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB770,3,7393.49 (3) (a) (intro.) From the appropriation under s. 20.115 (4) (as), the 4department shall provide grants to school districts, in coordination with the 5department of public instruction, and to nonprofit organizations, farmers, and any 6other entities for the creation and expansion of farm to school programs. The 7department shall give preference to the following types of proposals:SB770,3,982. Proposals that are innovative or that provide models that other school 9districts can adopt.SB770,510Section 5. 93.49 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB770,3,131193.49 (3) (a) 1. Proposals from school districts in which a high percentage of 12pupils satisfy the income eligibility criteria under 42 USC 1758 (b) (1) for a free or 13reduced-price meal.SB770,614Section 6. 93.63 of the statutes is created to read:SB770,3,151593.63 Farm to fork program. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB770,3,2116(a) “Farm to fork program” means a program to connect entities that are not 17school districts and that have cafeterias to nearby farms to provide locally produced 18fresh fruits and vegetables, dairy products, and other nutritious, locally produced 19foods in meals and snacks; to help the public develop healthy eating habits; to 20provide nutritional and agricultural education; and to improve farmers’ incomes 21and direct access to markets.SB770,3,2322(b) “Value-added agricultural product” means a farm product that satisfies 23any of the following:SB770,4,111. The product has undergone a change in physical state.SB770,4,222. The product is produced in a manner that enhances its value.SB770,4,333. The product is physically segregated in a manner that enhances its value.SB770,4,444. The product is a source of farm-based or ranch-based renewable energy.SB770,4,655. The product is aggregated and marketed as a locally produced farm 6product.SB770,4,117(2) Grants. (a) The department may award grants from the appropriation 8under s. 20.115 (4) (at) to businesses, universities, hospitals, and other entities that 9are not school districts and that have cafeterias for the creation and expansion of 10farm to fork programs. The department shall give preference to proposals that are 11innovative or that provide models that other entities can adopt.SB770,4,1512(b) In awarding grants under this section, the department shall promote 13agricultural development and farm profitability by supporting the development and 14adoption of practices and agribusiness opportunities that involve the production of 15value-added agricultural products.SB770,4,1716(c) The department may award grants under this subsection for projects that 17do any of the following:SB770,4,20181. Create, expand, diversify, or promote production, processing, marketing, 19and distribution of food produced in this state for sale to entities in this state other 20than school districts.SB770,4,23212. Create, expand, or renovate facilities, including purchases of equipment for 22the facilities, that would ensure the use of food produced in this state in locations in 23this state other than schools.SB770,5,213. Provide, expand, or promote training for food service personnel, farmers, 2and distributors.SB770,5,334. Provide, expand, or promote nutritional and agricultural education.SB770,5,54(d) The department shall consult with interested persons to establish grant 5priorities for each fiscal year.SB770,5,86(3) Reports. At least annually, the department shall report to the legislature 7under s. 13.172 (2) and to the secretary on the needs and opportunities for farm to 8fork programs.SB770,5,99(4) Rules. The department may promulgate rules to administer this section.SB770,710Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.SB770,5,1411(1) Farm to fork program. The authorized FTE positions for the 12department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection are increased by 1.0 GPR 13positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.115 (4) (at), for the 14purpose of administering the farm to fork program.SB770,815Section 8. Fiscal changes.SB770,5,2016(1) Farm to school grants. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 17appropriation to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection 18under s. 20.115 (4) (as), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by 19$16,800 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $16,800 for 20the purpose for which the appropriation is made.SB770,5,2121